Hawaii, session 2026, HB1934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 312, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§312-     Imagination library of Hawaii program; established.  (a)  The state librarian shall establish an imagination library of Hawaii program to provide one free book each month to eligible children. (b)  The state librarian shall contract with a nonprofit organization to implement the imagination library of Hawaii program established pursuant to this section.  In implementing the program, the nonprofit organization shall: (1)  Provide an amount of at least fifty per cent of the funds required to carry out the program; (2)  Promote the statewide development of local book gifting programs; (3)  Provide outreach to local communities about developing local book-gifting programs in those communities; (4)  Recruit community partners to assist in the implementation and administration of local book gifting programs; (5)  Advance and strengthen local book-gifting programs to increase enrollment in the program; (6)  Develop community engagement related to local book‑gifting programs; and (7)  Enter into a contract with a national nonprofit foundation to provide age-appropriate, high-quality books each month to eligible children at no cost. (c)  The state librarian may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. (d)  As used in this section: "Eligible children" means children from birth through five years of age who reside in the State. "National nonprofit foundation" means a nonprofit entity with a national presence that exists for the purpose of working with local entities to identify and provide age‑appropriate, high quality books each month to eligible children at no cost to families." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation of the imagination library of Hawaii program established by section 312-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state public library system for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________